District of Columbia statutes.
34-506

Stock to be void unless law is complied with.

All stocks, certificates of stock, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness issued contrary to the provisions of this subtitle shall be void.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 990, ch. 150, § 8, par. 78

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-706.
1973 Ed., § 43-807.